Utah statutes.
7-5-12.   Directors' audit of trust business -- Report available to
commissioner or examiners -- Examinations in lieu of audit.
A committee of the board of directors, exclusive of any active officers of the
trust department, of every trust company authorized to engage in the trust
business in this state shall, at least once during a 15-month period, make a
suitable audit of the trust business operations of the institution or cause a
suitable audit to be made by auditors responsible only to the board of
directors and shall ascertain whether the trust business operations of the
institution have been administered in accordance with law and sound fiduciary
principles. A report of the audit, together with the action taken thereon,
shall be made available to the commissioner, his examiners, or the examiners
of other trust company regulating agencies upon request. An examination by the
state or other trust company regulating agencies or both made during the same
period may be substituted for this audit.
